Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-128
Bond; State Treasurer; premium paid by state; conditions.

Whenever the State Treasurer in giving the bond required from him by law shall furnish a bond executed by a surety company authorized by the laws of this state to execute such bond, and such bond shall be approved by the Governor, then in each case the state shall pay the premium for such bond, not to exceed one-half of one percent per annum of the penalty in the bond so executed and approved.

Laws 1905, c. 209, § 1, p. 703;

R.S.1913, § 5733;

C.S.1922, § 5062;

C.S.1929, § 12-126;

Laws 1935, c. 24, § 1, p. 117;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 12-126;

R.S.1943, § 11-128.